Hawaii statutes.
§205-4.1 Fees. The commission may
establish reasonable fees for the filing of boundary amendment petitions and
petitions for intervention to cover the cost of processing thereof and for the
reproduction of maps and documents. The commission also may assess a
reasonable fee or require reimbursements to be made for court reporter
expenses, the inexcusable absence of a party from a boundary amendment
proceeding, and any other reimbursements for hearing expenses as determined by
the commission. Any fees collected shall be deposited to the credit of the
general fund. [L 1983, c 49, §2; am L 1999, c 260, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next